Idaho, session 2026, H0696.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-6110, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-6110. SEXUAL CONTACT WITH A PRISONER. (1) It is a felony for any em-
ployee of the Idaho department of correction, Idaho department of juvenile
corrections or any officer, employee or agent of a state, local or private
correctional facility, as those terms are defined in section 18-101A, Idaho
Code, to have sexual contact with a prisoner or juvenile offender, not their
spouse, whether an in-state or out-of-state prisoner or juvenile offender,
as those terms are defined in section 18-101A, Idaho Code.
(2) It is a felony for any supervising officer, as that term is defined
in section 18-101A, Idaho Code, to knowingly have sexual contact with any
parolee or probationer, as those terms are defined in section 18-101A, Idaho
Code, who is not the person's spouse.
(3) For the purposes of this section "sexual contact" means sexual in-
tercourse, genital-genital contact, manual-anal contact, manual-genital
contact, oral-genital contact, anal-genital contact or, oral-anal contact,
contact between the mouth and any body part, or any willful physical contact,
over or under the clothing, when the physical contact is done with the in-
tent of arousing, appealing to, or gratifying the lust, passion, or sexual
desires of the actor or any other person, between persons of the same or oppo-
site sex.
(4) Any person found guilty of sexual contact with a prisoner or juve-
nile offender is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term
not to exceed life.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.